Utah statutes.
63M-2-202.   Technology outreach program.

(1)  As funding becomes available from the Legislature or other sources, the Utah Science Technology and Research Governing Authority created in Part 3 shall establish a technology outreach program at up to five locations distributed strategically throughout Utah.

(2) (a)  The governing authority shall ensure that the technology outreach program acts as a resource to:

(i)  broker ideas, new technologies, and services to entrepreneurs and businesses throughout a defined service area;

(ii)  engage local entrepreneurs and professors at applied technology centers, colleges, and universities by connecting them to Utah's research universities;

(iii)  screen business ideas and new technologies to ensure that the ones with the highest growth potential receive the most targeted services and attention;

(iv)  connect market ideas and technologies in new or existing businesses or industries or in regional colleges and universities with the expertise of Utah's research universities;

(v)  assist businesses, applied technology centers, colleges, and universities in developing commercial applications for their research; and

(vi)  disseminate and share discoveries and technologies emanating from Utah's research universities to local entrepreneurs, businesses, applied technology centers, colleges, and universities.

(b)  In designing and operating the technology outreach program, the governing authority shall work cooperatively with the Technology Commercialization Offices at Utah State University and the University of Utah.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

